Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
PART 2 Acquisition of Right to Flood Roads and Highways

22-3-40.
“Public road” and “public highway” defined.

As used in this part, the term “public road” or “public highway” means not only roads and highways proper but bridges, culverts, and appurtenances as well.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 370, § 4; Code 1933, § 36-803.

22-3-41.
Power to acquire right to flood roads and highways.

Any person referred to in Code Section 22-3-20 shall have the right and authority to acquire by purchase or condemnation the right to flood private roads or highways. Any such person shall also have the right to acquire by condemnation the right to flood public roads or highways by paying to the state or county authorities having jurisdiction over the same the cost of locating, laying out, constructing, and opening other public roads or highways to replace the public roads or highways flooded or intended to be flooded and also by paying to the state and county authorities any other damages that may be the natural and probable consequence of such flooding.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 272, § 1; Code 1933, § 36-804.

Cross references.

Abandonment of public roads, T. 32, C. 7.

22-3-42.
Notice of intention to condemn.

If a public road or highway for which condemnation is sought is a part of the state highway system or if jurisdiction or control of the road or highway has been taken over or assumed by the State Transportation Board or other state authority, the notice of intention to condemn shall be addressed to and served upon the commissioner of transportation. If the road or highway is under the supervision or control of county authorities, the notice of intention to condemn shall be addressed to and served upon the judge of the probate court or upon any county commissioner or such other officer as is by law vested with jurisdiction over and control of the public roads of the county in which the road to be condemned is located.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 370, § 4; Code 1933, § 36-808.

22-3-43.
Condemnation procedure; authorization of officers to act for state or county.

The procedure in the condemnation of public roads and highways shall be the same as provided by Chapter 2 of this title insofar as the procedures described in that chapter are not in conflict with this part. The public officer or officers to be notified and served as provided in Code Section 22-3-42 shall act for and in behalf of the state or county, as the case may be, in the appointment of an assessor and in all other respects as provided in Chapter 2 of this title with respect to the owner of the property or interest sought to be condemned.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 370, § 4; Code 1933, § 36-809.

22-3-44.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Appeal to superior court.

Within 30 days after the award of condemnation is made pursuant to Part 4 of Article 1 of Chapter 2 of this title or pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 2 of this title, any party may appeal to the superior court of the county in which the public roads or highways lie by filing with the judge of the probate court of the county a written notice of appeal. Within ten days after his receipt of the notice, the judge shall transmit the notice to the superior court. The trial on such an appeal shall be de novo.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 272, § 1; Code 1933, § 36-805.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 22-3-44 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

22-3-44.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Appeal to superior court.

Within 30 days after the award of condemnation is made pursuant to Part 4 of Article 1 of Chapter 2 of this title or pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 2 of this title, any party may appeal to the superior court of the county in which the public roads or highways lie by filing a petition for review with the superior court. The trial on such an appeal shall be de novo. The proceedings on the petition for review shall be governed by Chapter 3 of Title 5.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 272, § 1; Code 1933, § 36-805; Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 2-15/HB 916.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 22-3-44 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, rewrote this Code section, which read: “Within 30 days after the award of condemnation is made pursuant to Part 4 of Article 1 of Chapter 2 of this title or pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 2 of this title, any party may appeal to the superior court of the county in which the public roads or highways lie by filing with the judge of the probate court of the county a written notice of appeal. Within ten days after his receipt of the notice, the judge shall transmit the notice to the superior court. The trial on such an appeal shall be de novo.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 3-1/HB 916, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to petitions for review filed in superior or state court on or after July 1, 2023.

22-3-45.
Rights of condemnor pending appeal.

Upon the condemnor’s paying the sum fixed by the assessor’s award to the state or county authorities together with the cost of proceedings pending an appeal pursuant to Code Section 22-3-44 and upon the execution of a bond in double the amount of the award so fixed, with good and sufficient surety to pay the eventual condemnation award, the condemnor shall be entitled to flood the public roads or highways which are made the subject of the proceedings, provided that such right shall not vest absolutely in the condemnor until the final determination of the case and the payment or deposit in court of the final condemnation award.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 272, § 1; Code 1933, § 36-806.

22-3-46.
Restrictions on use of condemned road or highway by condemnor.

Before any public road or highway condemned under this part may be used by the condemnor, any new road or highway to be constructed pursuant to Code Section 22-3-41, including any and all bridges and culverts that may be necessary as a part thereof, shall be laid out, constructed, and made ready for public use by the condemnor. All of this new construction shall first be approved by the authorities having control of the condemned road or highway.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 370, § 4; Code 1933, § 36-810.

22-3-47.
Effect of part on rights of action of property owners and public utilities.

This part shall not be construed as taking away or in any way prejudicing any right of action possessed by a property owner or a public utility for damages to property caused by the closing of any public road or highway under this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 272, § 1; Code 1933, § 36-807.